Nevada, session 83, AB527.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.473 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.473 1. As used in this section, “traffic violation” means
conviction of a moving traffic violation in any municipal court,
justice court or district court in this State or a finding by any
municipal court or justice court in this State that a person has
committed a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive. The term includes a finding by a juvenile court
that a child has violated a traffic law or ordinance other than one
governing standing or parking. The term does not include [a] :
(a) A conviction or a finding by a juvenile court of a violation of
the speed limit posted by a public authority under the circumstances
described in subsection 1 of NRS 484B.617 [.] ; or
(b) A citation issued for a violation detected by a school bus
infraction detection system pursuant to section 2 of this act.
2. The Department shall establish a uniform system of demerit
points for various traffic violations occurring within this State
affecting the driving privilege of any person who holds a driver’s
license issued by the Department and persons deemed to have future
driving privileges pursuant to NRS 483.447. The system must be
based on the accumulation of demerits during a period of 12
months.
3. The system must be uniform in its operation, and the
Department shall set up a schedule of demerits for each traffic
violation, depending upon the gravity of the violation, on a scale of
one demerit point for a minor violation of any traffic law to eight
demerit points for an extremely serious violation of the law
governing traffic violations. If a conviction of two or more traffic
violations committed on a single occasion is obtained, points must
be assessed for one offense or civil infraction, and if the point values
differ, points must be assessed for the offense or civil infraction
having the greater point value. Details of the violation must be
submitted to the Department by the court where the conviction or
finding is obtained. The Department may provide for a graduated
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
system of demerits within each category of violations according to
the extent to which the traffic law was violated.
Sec. 2. Chapter 484A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A board of trustees of a school district may authorize the
installation and use of a school bus infraction detection system in
school buses owned by the school district to enforce the provisions
of NRS 484B.353.
2. The board of trustees of a school district that authorizes
the installation and use of a school bus infraction detection
system:
(a) May enter into a contractual agreement with a third party
vendor to install and administer such a school bus infraction
detection system; and
(b) Shall enter into an agreement with a traffic enforcement
agency with jurisdiction over the location in which any school bus
equipped with a school bus infraction detection system operates to
review the evidence of any alleged infraction of NRS 484B.353
recorded by the school bus infraction detection system.
3. If a school district has not previously installed and used a
school bus infraction detection system the school district shall, for
not less than 30 days after a school bus infraction detection system
is placed into use by the school district:
(a) Conduct a public awareness campaign regarding the use of
school bus infraction detection systems within the school district;
and
(b) Notify the public of the specific date on which a violation
detected by the school bus infraction detection system will become
enforceable.
4. If, during the period the public awareness campaign
described in subsection 3 is conducted, a peace officer of a traffic
enforcement agency determines from evidence recorded by a
school bus infraction detection system that a person has violated
NRS 484B.353, the peace officer may issue only a warning.
5. If, after reviewing the evidence recorded by a school bus
infraction detection system, a peace officer of a traffic
enforcement agency determines that a violation of NRS 484B.353
occurred in a location over which the traffic enforcement agency
has jurisdiction, the peace officer shall cause a civil infraction
citation to be issued pursuant to NRS 484A.7033 for the violation
to be sent by the traffic enforcement agency or its designee by first
class mail to the address listed with the Department for the
registered owner of the vehicle identified by the school bus
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
infraction detection system. A manual or automated record
prepared by the traffic enforcement agency or its designee
evidencing that the citation was mailed is prima facie evidence of
service and shall be admissible in any hearing as to the facts
contained in the civil infraction citation.
6. In addition to the information required by subsection 1 of
NRS 484A.7035, a civil infraction citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7033 for a violation described in subsection 5 must include:
(a) The date and time of the violation;
(b) A photograph or other recorded image produced by the
school bus infraction detection system, or the address of the
Internet website on which such an image may be viewed, showing:
(1) The vehicle involved in the violation;
(2) If a stop arm was installed on the school bus, that the
stop arm was extended at the time of the violation; and
(3) An electronic indicator evidencing that the flashing red
light signals of the bus were activated at the time of the violation;
and
(c) A statement summarizing the provisions of subsection 8.
7. To the extent practicable, a school bus infraction detection
system shall not record images of the occupants of a motor vehicle
at the time in which the images are recorded by the system. A civil
infraction citation issued pursuant to this section may not be
dismissed because a recorded video or digital image includes
images of the occupants of the motor vehicle.
8. The registered owner of a vehicle is presumed to be the
driver of the vehicle at the time of a violation of NRS 484B.353
which was recorded by a school bus infraction detection system.
This presumption may be rebutted if the registered owner of the
vehicle submits an affidavit to the traffic enforcement agency or
its designee or presents an affidavit as evidence at a hearing held
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704 stating under penalty
of perjury:
(a) The name and address of the person having care, custody
and control of the vehicle at the time of the violation; or
(b) That the vehicle was, at the time of the violation, stolen.
9. An affidavit presented as evidence pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 8 must contain evidence that supports the
affidavit, including, without limitation, a police report or an
insurance report.
10. Photographs or other recorded images produced by a
school bus infraction detection system shall be deemed prima facie
evidence of a violation of NRS 484B.353 and are admissible at any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
hearing for a citation issued for a violation detected by a school
bus infraction detection system pursuant to this section without
further authentication. In any hearing for a citation issued for a
violation detected by a school bus infraction detection system,
there is a rebuttable presumption that:
(a) At the time in which a violation of NRS 484B.353 was
detected by a school bus infraction detection system, the school
bus was marked and equipped with signs and signals as required
by law; and
(b) Where recorded images from a school bus infraction
detection system show the activation of a stop arm or flashing red
light signals, the school bus was stopped to receive or discharge a
pupil and was displaying a flashing red light signal visible from
the front and rear of the school bus.
11. Any photograph or recorded image produced by a school
bus infraction detection system must be destroyed not later than 90
days after:
(a) If a peace officer of a traffic enforcement agency does not
cause to be issued a civil infraction citation pursuant to subsection
5 in connection with the photograph or recorded image, the date
on which the photograph or recorded image was produced; or
(b) If a peace officer of a traffic enforcement agency causes to
be issued a civil infraction citation pursuant to subsection 5 in
connection with the photograph or recorded image, the date on
which:
(1) The person receiving the civil infraction citation
submits, pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 484A.704, full payment
of the monetary penalty, the administrative assessment and any
fees to the court specified in the citation;
(2) The court enters an order dismissing the civil infraction
citation in the court’s records; or
(3) The court enters an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043
finding that the person committed the civil infraction and
assessing the monetary penalty and administrative assessments
prescribed for the civil infraction.
12. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a peace
officer from issuing a traffic citation for a violation of any law of
this State for which evidence is recorded by a school bus
infraction detection system if the peace officer personally
witnesses a violation. A person who is issued a traffic citation by a
peace officer pursuant to this subsection must not be issued a civil
infraction citation based on evidence recorded by the school bus
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
infraction detection system for the same violation for which the
peace officer issued the person the traffic citation.
13. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a hearing on
a civil infraction citation issued pursuant to this section shall be
conducted in accordance with NRS 484A.7041.
14. A violation of NRS 484B.353 for which a civil infraction
citation is issued pursuant to NRS 484A.7033 for a violation
described in subsection 5:
(a) Is not a moving traffic violation under NRS 483.473; and
(b) Is punishable by an administrative fine in an amount set by
the local authority, but not less than the fine imposed pursuant to
NRS 484B.353.
15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all
administrative fines assessed and collected for a violation of NRS
484B.353 through the use of a school bus infraction detection
system must be collected and remitted to the school district in
which the violation occurred. The school district shall use the
fines collected by this section to:
(a) Install, maintain or operate the school bus infraction
detection systems on school buses;
(b) Compensate a third party vendor to install, operate or
maintain the school bus infraction detection systems on school
buses;
(c) Support any other infrastructure or program that increases
the safety of transportation services for students; or
(d) Pay costs associated with the enforcement of violations
detected by a school bus infraction detection system.
16. On or before January 31 of each year, each school
district which uses a school bus infraction detection system shall
prepare and submit a report to the Legislature for the immediately
preceding year which includes, without limitation:
(a) The number of citations issued through the use of school
bus infraction detection systems;
(b) The total amount of revenue collected as a result of such
citations; and
(c) Any data related to the effectiveness of the use of school
bus infraction detection systems in reducing the number of
violations of NRS 484B.353.
17. As used in this section, “school bus infraction detection
system” means an electronic or digital system which produces a
photograph or other recorded image of a vehicle which is used as
evidence of a violation of NRS 484B.353 by the driver of the
vehicle.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 3. NRS 484A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.600 [A] Except as otherwise provided in section 2 of
this act, a governmental entity and any agent thereof shall not use
photographic, video or digital equipment for gathering evidence to
be used for the issuance of a traffic citation or civil infraction
citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation of chapters
484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS unless the equipment is a portable
camera or event recording device worn or held by a peace officer,
the equipment is otherwise installed temporarily or permanently
within a vehicle or facility of a law enforcement agency or the
equipment is privately owned by a nongovernmental entity.
Sec. 4. NRS 484A.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.640 1. Except for a citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.700 [,] or section 2 of this act, whenever a police officer
makes an arrest or issues a citation to a person for any violation of
chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS, the police officer shall
record the name as given by that person, the number of the person’s
driver’s license and a brief description of the person’s physical
appearance. This information must be maintained in a record for
offenses kept at the traffic enforcement agency which employs that
officer.
2. Whenever a police officer stops a driver of a motor vehicle
for any violation of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS and
requests information from a traffic enforcement agency concerning
that person’s record of prior offenses, the police officer shall
compare not only the driver’s name but also the number of his or her
driver’s license and physical description with any information
obtained from the agency as a result of the request. If the
information received from the agency indicates that the driver’s
name is on an outstanding warrant for a prior offense, the officer
shall not arrest the driver for that prior offense unless the additional
information used for comparison also connects the driver with that
prior offense.
Sec. 4.5. NRS 484A.703 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.703 1. [Every] Except for a citation issued for a
violation detected by a school bus infraction detection system
pursuant to section 2 of this act, every traffic enforcement agency
in this State shall provide in appropriate form civil infraction
citations containing notice of the civil infraction which must meet
the requirements of NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, and be:
(a) Issued in books; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) Available through an electronic device used to prepare such
citations.
2. The chief administrative officer of each traffic enforcement
agency is responsible for the issuance of such books and electronic
devices and shall maintain a record of each book, each electronic
device and each civil infraction citation issued to individual
members of the traffic enforcement agency. The chief administrative
officer shall require and retain a receipt for every book and
electronic device that is issued.
Sec. 5. NRS 484A.704 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.704 1. Any person who receives a civil infraction
citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 or 484A.7049 or section 2 of
this act shall respond to the citation as provided in this section not
later than 90 calendar days after the date on which the citation is
issued.
2. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation does not
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond to the
citation by indicating that the person does not contest the
determination and submitting full payment of the monetary penalty,
the administrative assessment and any fees to the court specified in
the citation, or its traffic violations bureau, in person, by mail or
through the Internet or other electronic means.
3. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation wishes to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond by
requesting in person, by mail or through the Internet or other
electronic means a hearing for that purpose. The court shall notify
the person in writing of the time, place and date of the hearing,
but the date of the hearing must not be earlier than 9 calendar days
after the court provides notice of the hearing.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, not less
than 30 days before the deadline for a person to respond to a civil
infraction citation, the court must send to the address or electronic
mail address of the person, as indicated on the civil infraction
citation issued to the person, a reminder that the person must
respond to the civil infraction citation within 90 calendar days after
the date on which the civil infraction citation is issued. If the person
agreed to receive communications relating to the civil infraction by
text message, the court may send such a notice to the telephone
number of the person as indicated on the civil infraction citation. If
the person does not respond to the civil infraction citation in the
manner specified by subsection 2 or 3 within 90 calendar days after
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
the date on which the civil infraction citation is issued, the court
must enter an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the
person committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil
infraction. A person who has been issued a civil infraction citation
and who fails to respond to the civil infraction citation as required
by this section may not appeal an order entered pursuant to this
section.
5. If any person issued a civil infraction citation fails to appear
at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3, the court must enter
an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the person
committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary penalty
and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil infraction. A
person who has been issued a civil infraction citation and who fails
to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3 may not
appeal an order entered pursuant to this subsection.
6. In addition to any other penalty imposed, any person who is
found by the court to have committed a civil infraction pursuant to
subsection 5 shall pay the witness fees, per diem allowances, travel
expenses and other reimbursement in accordance with NRS 50.225.
7. If a court has established a system pursuant to NRS
484A.615, any person issued a civil infraction citation may, if
authorized by the court, use the system to perform any applicable
actions pursuant to this section.
Sec. 6. NRS 484B.353 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.353 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the driver of any vehicle, when meeting or overtaking, from either
direction, any school bus, equipped with signs and signals required
by law, which has stopped to receive or discharge any pupil and is
displaying a flashing red light signal visible from the front and rear,
shall bring the vehicle to an immediate stop and shall not attempt to
overtake or proceed past the school bus until the flashing red signal
ceases operation.
2. The driver of a vehicle upon a divided highway need not
stop upon meeting or passing a school bus which is positioned in the
other roadway. The driver of a vehicle need not stop upon meeting
or passing a school bus where traffic is controlled by a traffic
officer.
3. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, any
person who violates any of the provisions of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor and:
(a) For a third or any subsequent offense within 2 years after the
most recent offense, shall be punished by a fine of not more than
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
$1,000 and the driver’s license of the person must be suspended for
not more than 1 year.
(b) For a second offense within 1 year after the first offense,
shall be punished by a fine of not less than $250 nor more than $500
and the driver’s license of the person must be suspended for 6
months.
(c) For a first offense or any subsequent offense for which a
punishment is not provided for in paragraph (a) or (b), shall be
punished by a fine of not less than $250 nor more than $500.
4. A police officer may issue a civil infraction citation to any
person who violates any of the provisions of this section detected
by a school bus infraction detection system pursuant to section 2
of this act.
Sec. 6.5. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)